Utah statutes.
31A-14-212.   Changes in business plan.
(1)  Within two years after the initial issuance of a certificate of authority
to a foreign insurer by its domiciliary jurisdiction, the insurer may not
substantially deviate from its business plan under Subsection
31A-14-201(2)(b)(xii) unless notice of the proposed action is filed with the
commissioner 30 days in advance of the proposed effective date.
(2)  If the commissioner believes that the change proposed under Subsection
(1) would be contrary to Utah law or to the interests of insureds, creditors,
or the public, he may prohibit the application of the change to Utah.  In his
prohibitory order he shall explain why he has prohibited the change.
(3)  If the commissioner finds after a hearing that the application of the
proposed change outside Utah would endanger the interests of insureds,
creditors, or the public in Utah, the commissioner may revoke the insurer's
certificate of authority unless the insurer agrees not to make the change.
